Maryland, session 2026, SB0632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
3–114.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “ACP number” means the unique identification number assigned to each
program participant by the Secretary [or], by the Office of Information Privacy, OR BY THE
OFFICE OF STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS INFORMATION PRIVACY.
(c) “Actual address” means a residential street address, school address, or work
address of an individual, as specified on the individual’s application to be a program
participant under Title 7, Subtitle 3 of the State Government Article.
(d) “Address Confidentiality Program” means [the]:
(1) THE Address Confidentiality Program for survivors of threatened,
attempted, or actual domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, harassment, or human
trafficking administered by the Secretary under Title 7, Subtitle 3 of the State Government
Article [and the];
(2) THE Judicial Address Confidentiality Program administered by the
Administrative Office of the Courts under Title 3, Subtitle 24 of the Courts Article; AND
(3) THE STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY
PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES
UNDER TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 19 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(e) (1) “Identity information” means information that may be used to identify
a program participant.

SENATE BILL 632 3
(2) “Identity information” includes a program participant’s:
(i) Name;
(ii) Phone number;
(iii) E–mail address;
(iv) Social Security number; and
(v) Driver’s license number.
(f) “Office of Information Privacy” means the Office of Information Privacy in the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(G) “OFFICE OF STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS INFORMATION PRIVACY”
MEANS THE OFFICE OF STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS INFORMATION PRIVACY IN THE
DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES.
[(g)] (H) “Program participant” means an individual designated by the Secretary
[or], by the Office of Information Privacy, OR BY THE OFFICE OF STATE ELECTED
OFFICIALS INFORMATION PRIVACY as a participant in an address confidentiality
program.
[(h)] (I) “Real Property ACP Notice” means the notice required under this part
for a program participant to request the shielding of real property records.
[(i)] (J) “Real property record” means any record or data maintained by a clerk
of the circuit court or a State or local agency as part of the land or tax records.
[(j)] (K) “Secretary” means the Secretary of State.
[(k)] (L) “Shield” means to remove real property records from public inspection
in accordance with this part.
[(l)] (M) “Shielding” means, with respect to a real property record accepted for
recording by a clerk of the circuit court or a State or local agency, removing the record to a
separate secure area to which persons who do not have a legitimate reason for access are
denied access.
Article – State Government
2–1206.
(a) The following units are in the Department:

SENATE BILL 632
(1) the Office of Legislative Audits;
(2) the Office of Program Evaluation and Government Accountability;
(3) the Office of Policy Analysis;
(4) the Office of Operations and Support Services; [and]
(5) THE OFFICE OF STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS INFORMATION
PRIVACY; AND
[(5)] (6) any other offices as may be designated by the President and the
Speaker.
(b) With the approval of the President and the Speaker and in consultation with
the minority leader of the Senate and the minority leader of the House of Delegates, the
Executive Director shall appoint the following office directors:
(1) the director of the Office of Legislative Audits;
(2) the director of the Office of Program Evaluation and Government
Accountability;
(3) the director of the Office of Policy Analysis;
(4) the director of the Office of Operations and Support Services; [and]
(5) THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE OF STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS
INFORMATION PRIVACY; AND
[(5)] (6) any director of an office designated by the President and the
Speaker under subsection [(a)(5)] (A)(6) of this section.
(c) Each office director serves without a fixed term and, subject to the approval of
the President and the Speaker and in consultation with the minority leader of the Senate
and the minority leader of the House of Delegates, may be removed by the Executive
Director.
(d) Each office director shall serve in a nonpartisan capacity and ensure that all
activities of the office are conducted in a nonpartisan manner.
(e) Each office director is entitled to the salary provided in the State budget.

SENATE BILL 632 5
(f) After consultation with the Executive Director, each office director may
appoint an appropriate number of qualified individuals to serve in management functions
in the respective offices.
SUBTITLE 18. PROTECTED INDIVIDUALS – PROTECTED INFORMATION.
10–1801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–1501 OF
THIS TITLE.
(C) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS
INFORMATION PRIVACY IN THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES.
(D) (1) “PERSONAL INFORMATION” MEANS:
(I) A HOME ADDRESS;
(II) A HOME TELEPHONE NUMBER;
(III) A MOBILE TELEPHONE NUMBER;
(IV) A PERSONAL E–MAIL ADDRESS;
(V) A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
(VI) A DRIVER’S LICENSE NUMBER;
(VII) A FEDERAL TAX IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(VIII) A BANK ACCOUNT NUMBER;
(IX) A CREDIT OR DEBIT CARD NUMBER;
(X) A LICENSE PLATE NUMBER OR UNIQUE IDENTIFIER OF A
VEHICLE;
(XI) A BIRTH OR MARITAL RECORD;
(XII) A CHILD’S NAME;

SENATE BILL 632
(XIII) A SCHOOL OR DAYCARE;
(XIV) A PLACE OF WORSHIP; OR
(XV) A PLACE OF EMPLOYMENT.
(2) “PERSONAL INFORMATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) INFORMATION THAT HAS BEEN PUBLICLY DISCLOSED WITH
THE CONSENT OF THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL; OR
(II) INFORMATION THAT IS RELEVANT TO AND DISPLAYED AS
PART OF A NEWS STORY, A COMMENTARY, AN EDITORIAL, OR ANY OTHER SPEECH ON
MATTERS OF PUBLIC CONCERN; OR
(III) INFORMATION THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE PUBLISHED UNDER
TITLE 5 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(E) “PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS:
(1) A CURRENT OR FORMER GOVERNOR OF MARYLAND;
(2) A CURRENT OR FORMER LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR OF MARYLAND;
(3) A CURRENT OR FORMER ATTORNEY GENERAL OF MARYLAND;
(4) A CURRENT OR FORMER COMPTROLLER OF MARYLAND;
(5) A CURRENT OR FORMER MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND SENATE;
(6) A CURRENT OR FORMER MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND HOUSE OF
DELEGATES; OR
(7) A SPOUSE, CHILD, OR DEPENDENT WHO RESIDES IN THE SAME
HOUSEHOLD AS AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEMS (1) THROUGH (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(F) “PUBLISH” MEANS TO POST OR OTHERWISE MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE
GENERAL PUBLIC ON THE INTERNET, SOCIAL MEDIA, OR SOCIAL NETWORKS.
10–1802.

SENATE BILL 632 7
(A) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, OR THE OFFICE ON BEHALF OF A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, MAY REQUEST THAT A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY:
(1) NOT PUBLISH THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL
INFORMATION; OR
(2) REMOVE THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL
INFORMATION FROM ANY EXISTING PUBLICATION.
(B) A REQUEST MADE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) BE IN WRITING;
(2) BE SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL;
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
PROVIDE SUFFICIENT INFORMATION TO CONFIRM THAT THE REQUESTER IS A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL; AND
(4) ADEQUATELY IDENTIFY THE DOCUMENT, POSTING, OR OTHER
PUBLICATION CONTAINING THE PERSONAL INFORMATION.
(C) A REQUEST MADE BY THE OFFICE CERTIFIES THAT A REQUESTER IS A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL AND NO FURTHER INFORMATION MAY BE REQUIRED TO
CONFIRM THAT THE REQUESTER IS A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL.
(D) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY SHALL PROMPTLY ACKNOWLEDGE RECEIPT OF THE
REQUEST IN WRITING BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL AND:
(1) TAKE STEPS REASONABLY NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE
PERSONAL INFORMATION IS NOT PUBLISHED; OR
(2) IF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION IS ALREADY PUBLISHED,
PROVIDE FOR THE REMOVAL OF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION WITHIN 72 HOURS
AFTER RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST.
(E) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL OR THE OFFICE MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR
A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION AGAINST A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY FOR:
(1) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(2) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; OR

SENATE BILL 632
(3) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
10–1803.
(A) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, OR THE OFFICE ON BEHALF OF A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, MAY REQUEST THAT A PERSON WHO HAS PUBLISHED THE
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL INFORMATION REMOVE THE PROTECTED
INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL INFORMATION FROM PUBLICATION.
(B) A REQUEST MADE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) BE IN WRITING;
(2) BE SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL;
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
PROVIDE SUFFICIENT INFORMATION TO CONFIRM THAT THE REQUESTER IS A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL; AND
(4) ADEQUATELY IDENTIFY THE DOCUMENT, POSTING, OR OTHER
PUBLICATION CONTAINING THE PERSONAL INFORMATION.
(C) A REQUEST MADE BY THE OFFICE CERTIFIES THAT A REQUESTER IS A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL AND NO FURTHER INFORMATION MAY BE REQUIRED TO
CONFIRM THAT THE REQUESTER IS A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL.
(D) THE PERSON TO WHOM THE REQUEST IS MADE SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE FOR THE REMOVAL OF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION
WITHIN 72 HOURS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST; AND
(2) NOTIFY THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL OR THE OFFICE BY
CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL OF THE REMOVAL.
(E) (1) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL OR THE OFFICE MAY BRING AN ACTION
FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION AGAINST A PERSON FOR:
(I) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; OR
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.

SENATE BILL 632 9
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE RELIEF PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A COURT FINDS THAT A PERSON WILLFULLY REFUSED TO
PROVIDE FOR THE REMOVAL OF PERSONAL INFORMATION KNOWING THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL ON BEHALF OF WHOM THE REQUEST WAS MADE WAS A PROTECTED
INDIVIDUAL, THE COURT MAY AWARD PUNITIVE DAMAGES.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY USE FUNDS ALLOTTED TO
THE MEMBER UNDER § 2–102 OF THIS ARTICLE TO ENGAGE AN INDIVIDUAL OR A
SERVICE TO AID IN THE IDENTIFICATION AND REMOVAL OF PUBLISHED PERSONAL
INFORMATION.
10–1804.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT KNOWINGLY PUBLISH THE PERSONAL
INFORMATION OF A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL IF:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW THAT
PUBLISHING THE PERSONAL INFORMATION POSES AN IMMINENT AND SERIOUS
THREAT TO THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL; AND
(2) THE PUBLISHING OF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION RESULTS IN:
(I) AN ASSAULT IN ANY DEGREE;
(II) HARASSMENT;
(III) TRESPASS; OR
(IV) MALICIOUS DESTRUCTION OF PROPERTY.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 18 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
SUBTITLE 19. PROTECTED INDIVIDUALS – STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS ADDRESS
CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM.
10–1901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 632
(B) “ACTUAL ADDRESS” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL STREET ADDRESS,
INCLUDING PRIMARY OR SECONDARY RESIDENCE, OF A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL AS
SPECIFIED ON THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S APPLICATION TO BE A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) “GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–1501 OF
THIS TITLE.
(D) “OFFICE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–1801 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE STATE ELECTED OFFICIALS ADDRESS
CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM.
(F) “PROGRAM PARTICIPANT” MEANS A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL
DESIGNATED AS A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) “PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–1801 OF
THIS TITLE.
10–1902.
THE PURPOSE OF THIS SUBTITLE IS TO:
(1) ENABLE STATE AND LOCAL AGENCIES TO RESPOND TO REQUESTS
FOR PUBLIC RECORDS WITHOUT DISCLOSING THE ACTUAL ADDRESS OF A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT;
(2) ENCOURAGE INTERAGENCY COOPERATION IN PROVIDING
ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY FOR PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS;
(3) ALLOW GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES AND PERSONS TO ACCEPT A
PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S USE OF AN ADDRESS DESIGNATED BY THE OFFICE AS A
SUBSTITUTE ADDRESS; AND
(4) PROVIDE A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT WITH PROTECTIONS IN
ADDITION TO THOSE PROVIDED UNDER SUBTITLE 18 OF THIS TITLE.
10–1903.
THE OFFICE SHALL ESTABLISH AND ADMINISTER A STATE ELECTED
OFFICIALS ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM FOR PROTECTED INDIVIDUALS.
10–1904.

SENATE BILL 632 11
(A) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL MAY APPLY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PROGRAM IN THE MANNER REQUIRED BY THE OFFICE.
(B) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM,
THE OFFICE SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE APPLICANT QUALIFIES AS A
PROGRAM PARTICIPANT.
10–1905.
(A) THE OFFICE MAY:
(1) REQUEST THAT A PERSON OR GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY USE A
SUBSTITUTE ADDRESS DESIGNATED BY THE OFFICE AS THE PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT’S ADDRESS;
(2) REQUEST THE SHIELDING OF REAL PROPERTY RECORDS ON
BEHALF OF A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT WHO HAS AN OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN REAL
PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 1, PART II OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE; AND
(3) REQUEST THAT A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S ACTUAL ADDRESS BE
SHIELDED FROM PUBLIC INSPECTION IN A RECORD MAINTAINED BY A
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY.
(B) A REQUEST MADE BY THE OFFICE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE CERTIFIES
THAT A REQUESTER IS A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT.
(C) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST BY THE OFFICE, A PERSON OR
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY SHALL:
(1) PROMPTLY ACKNOWLEDGE RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST IN
WRITING BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL; AND
(2) TAKE STEPS REASONABLY NECESSARY TO COMPLY.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, A
CUSTODIAN OF RECORD MAY:
(1) MAINTAIN A COPY OF A RECORD CONTAINING A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT’S ACTUAL ADDRESS IN A SEPARATE SECURE AREA TO WHICH THE
PERSONS WHO DO NOT HAVE A LEGITIMATE REASON FOR ACCESS ARE DENIED
ACCESS;

SENATE BILL 632
(2) PERMIT PUBLIC INSPECTION OF A RECORD WITH THE CONSENT OF
THE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT;
(3) PERMIT PUBLIC INSPECTION OF A RECORD WITH THE ACTUAL
ADDRESS REDACTED FROM THE RECORD; OR
(4) AFTER NOTIFICATION TO THE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT, PERMIT
PUBLIC INSPECTION OF A RECORD IF THE INSPECTION WILL FURTHER A
SUBSTANTIAL PUBLIC INTEREST OR A LEGITIMATE BUSINESS NEED.
10–1906.
A RECORD OF A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S ACTUAL ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE
NUMBER MAINTAINED BY THE OFFICE OR A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY IS NOT A
PUBLIC RECORD UNDER § 4–101 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
10–1907.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY DISCLOSE A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S
ACTUAL ADDRESS.
(B) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL OR THE OFFICE MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR
A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION FOR:
(1) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(2) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; OR
(3) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.